test/src/morphology/A-siiend_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sīend: # Noun 138 'eng /est söönud/fin' - full paradigm
     sīend+A+Sg+Nom: sīend
     sīend+A+Sg+Gen: [sīend, sīenõ]
     sīend+A+Sg+Par: sīendõ
     sīend+A+Sg+Dat: sīenõn
     sīend+A+Sg+Ins: sīenõks
     sīend+A+Sg+Ill: sīenõ
     sīend+A+Sg+Ela: sīenõst
     sīend+A+Pl+Nom: sīenõd
     sīend+A+Pl+Gen: sīenõd
     sīend+A+Pl+Par: sīenidi
     sīend+A+Pl+Dat: sīenõdõn
     sīend+A+Pl+Ins: sīenõdõks
     sīend+A+Pl+Ill: sīeniž
     sīend+A+Pl+Ela: sīenist
